Maryland, session 2025, SB0401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
SUBTITLE 13. MARYLAND AREA RAIL COMMUTER (MARC) RAIL AUTHORITY.
7–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0401*

SENATE BILL 401
INDICATED.
(B) “MARC” MEANS MARYLAND AREA RAIL COMMUTER RAIL SERVICE.
(C) “MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT” INCLUDES:
(1) (I) THE BRUNSWICK, CAMDEN, OR PENN LINES OF THE
MARYLAND AREA RAIL COMMUTER (MARC) SERVICE; AND
(II) EXTENDING MARC SERVICE; AND
(2) ANY ADDITIONS, IMPROVEMENTS, OR ENLARGEMENTS TO ANY OF
THE PROJECTS LISTED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, WHENEVER
AUTHORIZED.
(D) “TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY” MEANS THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
7–1302.
THERE IS A MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
7–1303.
(A) (1) THE SECRETARY IS THE CHAIR OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL DESIGNATE AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE CHAIR, THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY CONSISTS
OF:
(1) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER WITH A BACKGROUND IN RAIL TRANSIT,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(II) ONE MEMBER WITH A BACKGROUND IN RAIL TRANSIT,
APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE; AND
(2) THE FOLLOWING NONVOTING MEMBERS:
(I) AS AN EX OFFICIO MEMBER, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF

SENATE BILL 401 3
THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY; AND
(II) A MEMBER OF THE LABOR COMMUNITY THAT IS EMPLOYED
BY MARC, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF AN APPOINTED MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) AN APPOINTED MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN THREE
CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(D) AN APPOINTED MEMBER OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY IS ENTITLED
TO:
(1) THE COMPENSATION PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(2) REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE STANDARD STATE
TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(E) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO THE OPEN MEETINGS
ACT UNDER TITLE 3 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
7–1304.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY IS ENTITLED TO THE STAFF PROVIDED IN
THE STATE BUDGET.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY WITH
THE PERSONNEL OF THE DEPARTMENT THAT THE SECRETARY CONSIDERS
NECESSARY FOR PERFORMANCE OF THE MAINTENANCE AND OTHER FUNCTIONS
REQUIRED OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY TO MEET ITS OBLIGATIONS WITH
RESPECT TO ITS MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS.
7–1305.
(A) (1) ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE MARC RAIL

SENATE BILL 401
AUTHORITY HAS THOSE POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO THE SUPERVISION,
FINANCING, CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, MAINTENANCE, AND REPAIR OF MARC
RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS AS ARE GRANTED TO IT BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY:
(I) DELEGATE PROJECT OPERATIONS, MAINTENANCE, AND
REPAIR TO THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(II) USE FARE REVENUE TO PROVIDE THE ADMINISTRATION
WITH PAYMENTS FOR PROJECT OPERATIONS, MAINTENANCE, AND REPAIR.
(B) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY HAS GENERAL SUPERVISION OF MARC
RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS.
(C) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY SHALL FINANCE, CONSTRUCT, OPERATE,
REPAIR, AND MAINTAIN IN GOOD ORDER THE MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES.
(D) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE,
ADHERE TO THE TRANSIT PLANS PREPARED UNDER SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE.
7–1306.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY ACQUIRE, HOLD, AND DISPOSE OF
PROPERTY IN THE EXERCISE OF ITS POWERS AND PERFORMANCE OF ITS DUTIES.
(B) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY MAKE ANY CONTRACTS AND
AGREEMENTS NECESSARY OR INCIDENTAL TO THE EXERCISE OF ITS POWERS AND
PERFORMANCE OF ITS DUTIES.
(C) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY APPLY FOR AND RECEIVE GRANTS
FROM ANY FEDERAL AGENCY FOR THE PLANNING, CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, OR
FINANCING OF ANY PASSENGER RAIL OR TRANSIT PROJECT AND MAY RECEIVE AID
OR CONTRIBUTIONS OF MONEY, PROPERTY, LABOR, OR OTHER THINGS OF VALUE
FROM ANY SOURCE, TO BE HELD, USED, AND APPLIED FOR THE PURPOSES FOR
WHICH THE GRANTS, AID, AND CONTRIBUTIONS ARE MADE.
(D) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY DO ANYTHING ELSE NECESSARY OR
CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE POWERS GRANTED IN THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 401 5
7–1307.
SUBJECT TO TITLE 12 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE AND CHAPTER 608
OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 1976, THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY
MAY CONDEMN PROPERTY FOR ANY MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT.
7–1308.
THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY CONTRACT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION
TO AUTHORIZE ADMINISTRATION POLICE OFFICERS TO EXERCISE THE POWERS
DESCRIBED UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE ON PROPERTY OWNED, LEASED, OR
OPERATED BY OR UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
7–1309.
(A) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY, SHALL
DEVELOP AND, SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY,
ADOPT A 6–YEAR FINANCIAL FORECAST FOR THE OPERATIONS OF THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY.
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY:
(1) A DRAFT OF THE FINANCIAL FORECAST ON SUBMISSION OF THE
BUDGET BILL TO THE PRESIDING OFFICERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(2) THE FINANCIAL FORECAST AS APPROVED BY THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR.
(C) THE FINANCIAL FORECAST SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING
COMPONENTS:
(1) A SCHEDULE OF OPERATING EXPENSES;
(2) A SCHEDULE OF REVENUES, INCLUDING CONCESSIONS INCOME,
INVESTMENT INCOME, OTHER INCOME, AND TRANSFERS FROM THE DEPARTMENT;
(3) A SCHEDULE OF PLANNED BOND ISSUANCES, INCLUDING A
DETAILED SUMMARY OF BONDS ISSUED TO FUND THE CAPITAL PROGRAM AND
BONDS ISSUED TO FUND CAPITALIZED INTEREST;
(4) A SCHEDULE OF DEBT SERVICE IN EACH FISCAL YEAR FOR EACH

SENATE BILL 401
BOND ISSUANCE OF ALL DEBT ISSUED BY THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY, INCLUDING
DEBT SERVICE ESTIMATES OF PLANNED BOND ISSUANCES; AND
(5) A SUMMARY SCHEDULE FOR THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY THAT
INCLUDES:
(I) THE TOTAL CASH BALANCE;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE CASH BALANCE THAT IS
ENCUMBERED;
(III) THE ANNUAL CASH SURPLUS OR DEFICIT;
(IV) REVENUES;
(V) TRANSFERS TO THE DEPARTMENT FROM THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY;
(VI) TRANSFERS TO THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FROM THE
DEPARTMENT;
(VII) BOND SALES;
(VIII) EXPENDITURES FOR DEBT SERVICE;
(IX) OPERATING EXPENSES;
(X) CAPITAL EXPENSES;
(XI) MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS EXPENSE RESERVE
ACCOUNTS;
(XII) FORECASTED BOND INTEREST RATES;
(XIII) TOTAL BONDS OUTSTANDING; AND
(XIV) FINANCIAL COVERAGE RATIOS, INCLUDING THE RATIO OF
TOTAL CASH TO FARE REVENUES, THE DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO, AND THE
RATE COVENANT COMPLIANCE RATIO.
(D) THE FINANCIAL FORECAST SHALL INCLUDE, FOR EACH OF THE
COMPONENTS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION:

SENATE BILL 401 7
(1) ACTUAL INFORMATION FOR THE LAST FULL FISCAL YEAR; AND
(2) FORECASTS OF THE INFORMATION FOR EACH OF THE 6
SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, INCLUDING THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR, THE FISCAL
YEAR FOR THE PROPOSED BUDGET, AND THE NEXT 4 SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS.
7–1310.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY SHALL EMPLOY A GENERAL COUNSEL
WHO SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE SECRETARY.
(B) THE GENERAL COUNSEL IS ENTITLED TO THE COMPENSATION
DETERMINED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
7–1311.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY SHALL MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON
ITS WEBSITE:
(1) EACH OPEN MEETING AGENDA:
(I) AT LEAST 48 HOURS IN ADVANCE OF EACH MEETING; OR
(II) IF THE MEETING IS BEING HELD DUE TO AN EMERGENCY, A
NATURAL DISASTER, OR ANY OTHER UNANTICIPATED SITUATION, AS FAR IN
ADVANCE OF THE MEETING AS PRACTICABLE;
(2) MEETING MINUTES FROM THE PORTIONS OF A MEETING THAT
WERE HELD IN OPEN SESSION, NOT MORE THAN 2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE
MINUTES ARE APPROVED;
(3) LIVE VIDEO STREAMING OF EACH OPEN MEETING OF THE MARC
RAIL AUTHORITY THAT IS HELD AT:
(I) THE HEADQUARTERS OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY; OR
(II) ANY OTHER LOCATION WHERE THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY HAS HELD AT LEAST 10 MEETINGS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR; AND
(4) A COMPLETE AND UNEDITED ARCHIVED VIDEO RECORDING OF
EACH OPEN MEETING FOR WHICH LIVE VIDEO STREAMING WAS MADE AVAILABLE
UNDER ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR A MINIMUM OF 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE

SENATE BILL 401
OF THE MEETING.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SHALL PROVIDE TO
THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY THE TECHNICAL STAFF, SUPPORT, AND EQUIPMENT
NECESSARY TO LIVESTREAM THE OPEN MEETINGS OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
7–1312.
(A) ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOCATE TO THE
MARC RAIL AUTHORITY THE REVENUE NEEDED TO SUPPORT THE MARC
OPERATING AND CAPITAL BUDGETS.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
MARC FARES AND ANY OTHER REVENUE FROM CHARGES IMPOSED FOR MARC
SERVICE MAY BE USED ONLY TO SUPPORT THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY.
(2) TO THE EXTENT REQUIRED UNDER FINANCING AGREEMENTS
UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE ENTERED INTO ON OR BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2025, MARC FARES AND ANY OTHER REVENUE FROM CHARGES
IMPOSED FOR MARC SERVICE SHALL CONTINUE TO SUPPORT THOSE EXISTING
INSTRUMENTS AND OBLIGATIONS.
7–1313.
BY ONE OR MORE RESOLUTIONS, THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) FINANCE THE COST OF MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS;
(2) BORROW MONEY FROM TIME TO TIME FOR THAT PURPOSE; AND
(3) EVIDENCE THE BORROWING BY THE ISSUANCE AND SALE OF
REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION ON THE TERMS,
CONDITIONS, AND LIMITATIONS CONTAINED IN THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1314.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 7–1318(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, WITHOUT
LIMITING THE POWER OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY TO ISSUE ADDITIONAL
REVENUE BONDS UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF LAW THAT AUTHORIZE THE ISSUANCE
OF REVENUE BONDS OF PRIOR ISSUES, THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FROM TIME TO
TIME MAY ISSUE ITS REVENUE BONDS TO FINANCE THE COST OF ANY ONE OR MORE
OR COMBINATION OF MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS.

SENATE BILL 401 9
(B) AS TO REVENUE BONDS OF ANY ISSUE, THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY
MAY DETERMINE:
(1) THE DATE OR DATES OF ISSUE;
(2) THE DATE OR DATES AND AMOUNT OR AMOUNTS OF MATURITY,
WHICH NEED NOT BE IN EQUAL PRINCIPAL AMOUNTS OR CONSECUTIVE ANNUAL
INSTALLMENTS, BUT A BOND MAY NOT BE ISSUED TO MATURE LATER THAN 40 YEARS
AFTER THE DATE OF ITS ISSUE;
(3) THE RATE OR RATES OF INTEREST PAYABLE ON THE BONDS, OR
THE MANNER OF DETERMINING THE RATE OR RATES OF INTEREST, AND THE DATE
OR DATES OF PAYMENT OF INTEREST;
(4) THE TENOR, FORM OR FORMS, DENOMINATION OR
DENOMINATIONS, MANNER OF EXECUTION, AND PLACE OR PLACES OF PAYMENT OF
THE PRINCIPAL OF AND INTEREST ON THE BONDS, WHICH MAY BE AT ANY BANK OR
TRUST COMPANY WITHIN OR OUTSIDE THE STATE;
(5) WHETHER THE BONDS ARE TO BE ISSUED IN COUPON OR
REGISTERED FORM OR BOTH AND WHETHER PROVISION IS TO BE MADE FOR THE
REGISTRATION OF THE PRINCIPAL ONLY OF COUPON BONDS, FOR THE
RECONVERSION OF FULLY REGISTERED BONDS INTO COUPON FORM, AND FOR THE
REPLACEMENT OF BONDS THAT ARE MUTILATED, LOST, OR DESTROYED;
(6) WHETHER ALL OR ANY PART OF THE BONDS ARE REDEEMABLE
BEFORE MATURITY AND, IF SO, THE TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND PRICES OF
REDEMPTION; AND
(7) ANY OTHER MATTER RELATING TO THE FORM, TERMS,
CONDITIONS, ISSUANCE, SALE, AND DELIVERY OF THE BONDS.
(C) FORTY–FIVE DAYS BEFORE EACH ISSUANCE OF BONDS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT THE PROPOSED ISSUANCE TO THE
LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE FOR REVIEW AND COMMENT.
7–1315.
(A) (1) REVENUE BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE
EXECUTED ON BEHALF OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY BY THE MANUAL
SIGNATURE OF AT LEAST ONE AUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL.
(2) OTHER SIGNATURES ON THE BONDS MAY BE EITHER MANUAL OR

SENATE BILL 401
FACSIMILE.
(B) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE MANUAL OR FACSIMILE SIGNATURE APPEARS
ON ANY BOND OR COUPON ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE CEASES TO SERVE IN AN
AUTHORIZED CAPACITY BEFORE THE DELIVERY OF THE BOND, THE SIGNATURE
NEVERTHELESS IS AS VALID AND SUFFICIENT FOR ALL PURPOSES AS IF THE
INDIVIDUAL HAD REMAINED IN THAT CAPACITY UNTIL DELIVERY OF THE BOND.
7–1316.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW OR ANY RECITALS IN THE
INSTRUMENTS, THE REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF
OBLIGATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ARE INVESTMENT SECURITIES UNDER
THE LAWS OF THE STATE.
7–1317.
THE REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND THEIR ISSUANCE AND SALE ARE EXEMPT FROM
THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 8–206 AND 8–208 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, AND THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY SELL THEM AT
EITHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SALE IN THE MANNER AND FOR THE PRICE THAT IT
DETERMINES.
7–1318.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, REVENUE
BONDS MAY BE ISSUED BY THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY:
(1) WITHOUT OBTAINING THE CONSENT OF ANY INSTRUMENTALITY,
AGENCY, OR UNIT OF THE STATE; AND
(2) WITHOUT ANY PROCEEDINGS OR THE HAPPENING OF ANY
CONDITIONS OR THINGS OTHER THAN THOSE SPECIFICALLY REQUIRED BY THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) (I) REVENUE BONDS SECURED BY FARE REVENUE MAY BE
ISSUED IN ANY AMOUNT.
(II) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2026, THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY SHALL SUBMIT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT INCLUDES:

SENATE BILL 401 11
1. A RECOMMENDATION ON THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE
AMOUNT OF REVENUE BONDS THAT MAY BE OUTSTANDING AND UNPAID IN A FISCAL
YEAR; AND
2. WHETHER THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE AMOUNT
DETERMINED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHOULD BE ESTABLISHED BY
LAW OR REGULATION.
(III) THE RECOMMENDATION ON THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE
AMOUNT OF REVENUE BONDS THAT MAY BE OUTSTANDING AND UNPAID UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT OF:
1. ANY LOAN EXTENDED TO THE STATE UNDER THE
FEDERAL TRANSPORTATION INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCE AND INNOVATION ACT;
AND
2. ANY LINE OF CREDIT EXTENDED TO THE STATE
UNDER THE FEDERAL TRANSPORTATION INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCE AND
INNOVATION ACT, TO THE EXTENT THE STATE DRAWS ON THE LINE OF CREDIT.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, WITHOUT
THE APPROVAL OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY
ISSUE BONDS TO REFINANCE ALL OR ANY PART OF THE COST OF A PASSENGER RAIL
OR TRANSIT PROJECT FOR WHICH THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY PREVIOUSLY
ISSUED BONDS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1319.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 7–1318(B) AND 7–1332 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, IF BY REASON OF INCREASED CONSTRUCTION COSTS, ERROR IN
ESTIMATES, OR OTHERWISE, THE PROCEEDS OF THE REVENUE BONDS OF ANY ISSUE
ARE LESS THAN THE AMOUNT REQUIRED FOR THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE BONDS
ARE AUTHORIZED, ADDITIONAL REVENUE BONDS MAY BE ISSUED IN A SIMILAR
MANNER TO PROVIDE THE AMOUNT OF THE DEFICIENCY.
(B) (1) THE ADDITIONAL BONDS SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE OF THE SAME
ISSUE AND SHALL BE ENTITLED TO PAYMENT FROM THE SAME FUND, WITHOUT
PREFERENCE OR PRIORITY, AS THE BONDS FIRST ISSUED.
(2) IF THE PROCEEDS OF THE ADDITIONAL BONDS EXCEED THE
AMOUNT REQUIRED, THE EXCESS SHALL BE DEPOSITED TO THE CREDIT OF ANY
RESERVE FUND FOR THE BONDS OR, IF SO PROVIDED IN THE TRUST AGREEMENT
SECURING THE BONDS, MAY BE APPLIED TO THE COST OF ANY ADDITIONAL

SENATE BILL 401
PROJECT.
7–1320.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FROM TIME TO TIME MAY ISSUE ITS
REVENUE REFUNDING BONDS FOR:
(1) REFUNDING ANY BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY
REVENUE BONDS OF PRIOR ISSUES, INCLUDING THE PAYMENT OF ANY REDEMPTION
PREMIUM ON THE BONDS AND ANY INTEREST ACCRUED OR TO ACCRUE TO THE DATE
OF REDEMPTION OF THE BONDS;
(2) CONSTRUCTING IMPROVEMENTS OR EXTENSIONS TO OR
ENLARGEMENTS OF ANY MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT; AND
(3) PAYING ALL OR ANY PART OF THE COST OF ANY ADDITIONAL
MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT.
(B) THE ISSUANCE OF REVENUE REFUNDING BONDS, THE DETAILS OF
THEIR ISSUANCE, THE RIGHTS OF THEIR HOLDERS, AND THE RIGHTS, DUTIES, AND
OBLIGATIONS OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY WITH RESPECT TO THEM ARE
GOVERNED BY THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO REVENUE BONDS,
INSOFAR AS THOSE PROVISIONS MAY BE APPLICABLE.
7–1321.
BEFORE THE PREPARATION OF DEFINITIVE BONDS, THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE ITS INTERIM CERTIFICATES OR TEMPORARY BONDS, WITH
OR WITHOUT COUPONS, EXCHANGEABLE FOR DEFINITIVE BONDS WHEN THE
DEFINITIVE BONDS HAVE BEEN EXECUTED AND ARE AVAILABLE FOR DELIVERY.
7–1322.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE ITS BOND ANTICIPATION
NOTES, PAYABLE TO THE BEARER OR REGISTERED HOLDER OF THE NOTES, OUT OF
THE FIRST PROCEEDS OF THE NEXT SALE OF BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE RESOLUTION AUTHORIZING THE ISSUANCE OF BOND ANTICIPATION
NOTES MAY PROVIDE FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THESE NOTES IN SERIES, AS FUNDS ARE
REQUIRED, AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THESE NOTES AT MATURITY, WITH OR
WITHOUT RESALE.
(C) THE ISSUANCE OF BOND ANTICIPATION NOTES, THE DETAILS OF THEIR

SENATE BILL 401 13
ISSUANCE, THE RIGHTS OF THEIR HOLDERS, AND THE RIGHTS, DUTIES, AND
OBLIGATIONS OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY WITH RESPECT TO THEM ARE
GOVERNED BY THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO THE ISSUANCE OF
THE BONDS IN ANTICIPATION OF THE SALE OF WHICH THE NOTES ARE ISSUED,
INSOFAR AS THOSE PROVISIONS MAY BE APPLICABLE.
7–1323.
(A) (1) REVENUE BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE
SECURED BY A TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY AND A
CORPORATE TRUSTEE THAT MAY BE ANY TRUST COMPANY OR BANK HAVING TRUST
POWERS WITHIN OR OUTSIDE THE STATE.
(2) THE TRUST AGREEMENT MAY PLEDGE OR ASSIGN ALL OR ANY
PART OF THE REVENUES OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY OR OF ANY MARC
RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT, BUT MAY NOT MORTGAGE ANY PART OF ANY MARC
RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT.
(B) ANY TRUST AGREEMENT OR BOND AUTHORIZING RESOLUTION MAY:
(1) CONTAIN ANY PROVISIONS FOR THE PROTECTION AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF BONDHOLDERS AS ARE
CONSIDERED REASONABLE AND PROPER, INCLUDING COVENANTS SETTING FORTH
THE DUTIES OF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY AS TO THE FINANCING OR
DEVELOPMENT OF ANY MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT, THE EXTENSION,
ENLARGEMENT, IMPROVEMENT, MAINTENANCE, OPERATION, REPAIR, AND
INSURANCE OF THE PROJECT, AND THE CUSTODY, SAFEGUARDING, AND
APPLICATION OF MONEY;
(2) PROVIDE FOR THE EMPLOYMENT OF CONSULTING ENGINEERS IN
CONNECTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OR OPERATION OF ANY MARC RAILROAD
FACILITIES PROJECT;
(3) SET FORTH THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF THE BONDHOLDERS
AND OF THE TRUSTEE;
(4) RESTRICT THE INDIVIDUAL RIGHT OF ACTION BY BONDHOLDERS;
AND
(5) CONTAIN ANY OTHER PROVISIONS THAT THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY CONSIDERS REASONABLE AND PROPER FOR THE SECURITY OF THE
BONDHOLDERS, INCLUDING:

SENATE BILL 401
(I) COVENANTS TO RESTRICT OR PROHIBIT THE
CONSTRUCTION OR OPERATION OF COMPETING MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES; AND
(II) COVENANTS RELATING TO THE ISSUANCE OF ADDITIONAL
PARITY BONDS ON STATED CONDITIONS CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) ALL EXPENSES INCURRED IN CARRYING OUT THE TRUST AGREEMENT
MAY BE TREATED AS A PART OF THE COST OF THE OPERATION OF THE MARC
RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT IN CONNECTION WITH WHICH THE BONDS HAVE
BEEN ISSUED.
(D) THE PROCEEDS OF THE SALE OF BONDS SHALL BE PAID TO THE
TRUSTEE UNDER THE TRUST AGREEMENT SECURING THE BONDS AND SHALL BE
DISBURSED IN THE MANNER AND UNDER THE RESTRICTIONS, IF ANY, PROVIDED IN
THE TRUST AGREEMENT.
(E) ANY BANK OR TRUST COMPANY INCORPORATED UNDER THE LAWS OF
THE STATE THAT ACTS AS DEPOSITARY OF THE PROCEEDS OF THE BONDS OR OF
REVENUES MAY FURNISH ANY INDEMNIFYING BONDS OR PLEDGE ANY SECURITIES
THAT THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY REQUIRES.
7–1324.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, IF THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY IS OPERATING A MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT, THE MARC
RAIL AUTHORITY SHALL FIX, REVISE, CHARGE, AND COLLECT RENTALS, RATES,
FEES, FARES, AND OTHER CHARGES FOR ITS USE OR FOR ITS SERVICES CONSISTENT
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 7–208, 7–505, AND 7–506 OF THIS TITLE AS THOSE
PROVISIONS APPLY TO THE ADMINISTRATION.
7–1325.
(A) (1) ALL RENTALS, RATES, FARES, FEES, AND OTHER CHARGES AND
REVENUES DERIVED FROM ANY MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT SHALL BE
SET ASIDE IN A FUND KNOWN AS THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FUND, EXCEPT TO
THE EXTENT THAT THEY ARE PLEDGED UNDER AN APPLICABLE TRUST AGREEMENT
TO SECURE EITHER:
(I) REVENUE BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE
TRUST AGREEMENT OR BOND AUTHORIZING RESOLUTION EXPRESSLY PROVIDES
THAT THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THOSE BONDS; OR

SENATE BILL 401 15
(II) REVENUE BONDS OF PRIOR ISSUES.
(2) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
RENTALS, RATES, FARES, FEES, AND OTHER CHARGES AND REVENUES DERIVED
FROM ANY MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECT, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT
THEY ARE PLEDGED UNDER AN APPLICABLE TRUST AGREEMENT; AND
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FUND.
(3) MONEY DISTRIBUTED TO THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FUND
SHALL BE USED ONLY FOR THE MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS.
(4) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY FUND SHALL BE PLEDGED TO AND
CHARGED WITH THE PAYMENT OF:
(I) THE INTEREST ON BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AS
IT FALLS DUE;
(II) THE PRINCIPAL OF THE BONDS AS IT FALLS DUE;
(III) THE NECESSARY CHARGES OF PAYING AGENTS FOR PAYING
PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST; AND
(IV) THE REDEMPTION PRICE OR PURCHASE PRICE OF BONDS
RETIRED BY CALL OR PURCHASE AS PROVIDED IN THE BOND AUTHORIZING
RESOLUTION OR TRUST AGREEMENT.
(B) (1) THE PLEDGE IS VALID AND BINDING FROM THE TIME IT IS MADE.
(2) RENTALS, RATES, FARES, FEES, AND OTHER CHARGES AND
REVENUES OR OTHER MONEY SO PLEDGED AND LATER RECEIVED BY THE MARC
RAIL AUTHORITY IMMEDIATELY SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE
WITHOUT PHYSICAL DELIVERY OR ANY FURTHER ACT.
(3) THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE IS VALID AND BINDING AS AGAINST ALL
PARTIES HAVING ANY CLAIMS OF ANY KIND IN TORT, CONTRACT, OR OTHERWISE
AGAINST THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY, WHETHER OR NOT THESE PARTIES HAVE
NOTICE OF THE PLEDGE.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, NEITHER THE

SENATE BILL 401
RESOLUTION NOR ANY TRUST AGREEMENT BY WHICH A PLEDGE IS CREATED NEED
BE FILED OR RECORDED OTHER THAN IN THE RECORDS OF THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY.
(C) THE USE AND DISPOSITION OF MONEY TO THE CREDIT OF THE MARC
RAIL AUTHORITY FUND IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISION OF THE APPLICABLE BOND
AUTHORIZING RESOLUTION OR TRUST AGREEMENT.
7–1326.
WITHOUT IN ANY WAY LIMITING OR RESTRICTING ITS EFFECT OR
APPLICATION, THIS SUBTITLE IS INTENDED TO AUTHORIZE THE MARC RAIL
AUTHORITY TO FINANCE ANY ONE OR MORE OR ANY COMBINATION OF MARC
RAILROAD FACILITIES PROJECTS BY ANY ONE OR MORE OR COMBINATION OF ISSUES
OR SERIES OF BONDS SECURED BY THE PLEDGE OF THE NET OR GROSS OR ANY
COMBINATION OF THE NET OR GROSS RENTALS, RATES, FARES, FEES, AND OTHER
CHARGES AND REVENUES DERIVED FROM ANY MARC RAILROAD FACILITIES
PROJECT OR COMBINATION OF PROJECTS DESIGNATED BY ANY BOND AUTHORIZING
RESOLUTION OR TRUST AGREEMENT SECURING THE BONDS.
7–1327.
ALL MONEY THAT IS RECEIVED BY THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY AS
PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER EVIDENCES OF
OBLIGATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND BY WAY OF RENTALS, RATES, FARES, FEES,
AND OTHER CHARGES AND REVENUES DERIVED FROM ANY MARC RAILROAD
FACILITIES PROJECT OR COMBINATION OF PROJECTS AND THAT IS DESIGNATED BY
ANY AUTHORIZING RESOLUTION OR TRUST AGREEMENT AS SECURITY FOR THE
BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE
TRUST FUNDS TO BE HELD AND APPLIED ONLY AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1328.
EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT RESTRICTED BY THE TRUST AGREEMENT, THE
TRUSTEE OR ANY HOLDER OF REVENUE BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR
OF ANY OF THE COUPONS APPERTAINING TO THE BONDS MAY:
(1) BRING A SUIT, AN ACTION, A MANDAMUS, OR ANY OTHER
PROCEEDING AT LAW OR IN EQUITY TO PROTECT AND ENFORCE ANY RIGHT UNDER
THE LAWS OF THE STATE OR UNDER THE BOND AUTHORIZING RESOLUTION OR
TRUST AGREEMENT; AND
(2) ENFORCE AND COMPEL THE PERFORMANCE OF ALL DUTIES

SENATE BILL 401 17
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE OR BY THE TRUST AGREEMENT TO BE PERFORMED BY
THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY OR BY ANY OF ITS OFFICERS, INCLUDING THE FIXING,
CHARGING, AND COLLECTING OF RENTALS, RATES, FARES, FEES, AND OTHER
CHARGES AND REVENUES.
7–1329.
(A) ALL PUBLIC OFFICERS AND PUBLIC AGENCIES OF THE STATE AND ITS
POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS, ALL BANKS, TRUST COMPANIES, SAVINGS AND LOAN
ASSOCIATIONS, INVESTMENT COMPANIES, AND OTHERS CARRYING ON A BANKING
BUSINESS, ALL INSURANCE COMPANIES, INSURANCE ASSOCIATIONS, AND OTHERS
CARRYING ON AN INSURANCE BUSINESS, ALL PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVES,
GUARDIANS, TRUSTEES, AND OTHER FIDUCIARIES, AND ALL OTHER PERSONS MAY
LEGALLY AND PROPERLY INVEST FUNDS, INCLUDING CAPITAL IN THEIR CONTROL
OR BELONGING TO THEM, IN REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF
OBLIGATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THESE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION MAY
LEGALLY AND PROPERLY BE DEPOSITED WITH AND RECEIVED BY ANY STATE OR
MUNICIPAL OFFICER OR ANY AGENCY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE
FOR ANY PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE DEPOSIT OF BONDS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS OF
THE STATE IS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
7–1330.
THE REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THEIR TRANSFER, THE INTEREST PAYABLE ON
THEM, AND ANY INCOME DERIVED FROM THEM, INCLUDING ANY PROFIT REALIZED
IN THEIR SALE OR EXCHANGE, SHALL BE EXEMPT AT ALL TIMES FROM EVERY KIND
AND NATURE OF TAXATION BY THE STATE OR BY ANY OF ITS POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS, OR BY PUBLIC AGENCIES OF ANY KIND.
7–1331.
(A) THE REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ARE NOT AND MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED TO
CONSTITUTE A DEBT OR A PLEDGE OF THE FAITH AND CREDIT OF THE STATE OF
MARYLAND, BUT SHALL BE PAYABLE ONLY FROM THE FUNDS FROM OR REVENUES
PROVIDED BY THIS SUBTITLE FOR THAT PURPOSE.
(B) ALL REVENUE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL CONTAIN A STATEMENT ON THEIR FACE TO
THE EFFECT THAT:

SENATE BILL 401
(1) THE STATE IS NOT OBLIGATED TO PAY THE PRINCIPAL OF OR THE
INTEREST ON THEM EXCEPT FROM REVENUES; AND
(2) NEITHER THE FAITH AND CREDIT NOR THE TAXING POWER OF
THE STATE IS PLEDGED TO THE PAYMENT OF THE PRINCIPAL OF OR THE INTEREST
ON THEM.
7–1332.
IF THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY INTENDS TO PLEDGE ANY FUTURE FEDERAL
AID FROM ANY SOURCE TO SUPPORT REPAYMENT OF ANY DEBT INSTRUMENT ISSUED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) THE AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF DEBT ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE OR TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE THAT IS SECURED BY A
PLEDGE OF FUTURE FEDERAL AID MAY NOT EXCEED $1,000,000,000 AS OF JUNE 30
OF ANY FISCAL YEAR;
(2) THE DATE OF MATURITY MAY NOT BE LATER THAN 12 YEARS
AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUE;
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING § 3–215(D) OF THIS ARTICLE, IF FUTURE
FEDERAL AID IS INSUFFICIENT TO PAY THE PRINCIPAL OF AND INTEREST ON THE
BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WHEN DUE, THE TAX LEVIED UNDER § 3–215
OF THIS ARTICLE, TO THE EXTENT THE PROCEEDS OF THE TAX ARE NOT NECESSARY
TO PROVIDE THE SINKING FUND REQUIRED UNDER § 3–215(C) OF THIS ARTICLE, IS
IRREVOCABLY PLEDGED TO THE PAYMENT OF THE PRINCIPAL OF AND INTEREST ON
THE BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AS THEY BECOME DUE AND PAYABLE;
(4) THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE UNDER ITEM (3) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL AT ALL TIMES BE SUBORDINATE TO THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE OF THE TAX
UNDER § 3–215(D) OF THIS ARTICLE TO THE PAYMENT OF PRINCIPAL OF AND
INTEREST ON CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION BONDS; AND
(5) NO PART OF THE TAX LEVIED UNDER § 3–215 OF THIS ARTICLE
MAY BE REPEALED, DIMINISHED, OR APPLIED TO ANY OTHER PURPOSE UNTIL:
(I) THE BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND INTEREST
ON THEM HAVE BECOME DUE AND FULLY PAID; OR
(II) ADEQUATE AND COMPLETE PROVISION FOR PAYMENT OF
THE PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST HAS BEEN MADE.

SENATE BILL 401 19
7–1333.
(A) THE MARC RAIL AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE BOND ANTICIPATION NOTES
SECURED BY A PLEDGE OF A LINE OF CREDIT EXTENDED TO THE STATE UNDER THE
FEDERAL TRANSPORTATION INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCE AND INNOVATION ACT.
(B) NOTES ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL HAVE A MATURITY DATE OF
UP TO 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUE.
(C) A PLEDGE OF A LINE OF CREDIT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION
DOES NOT CONSTITUTE THE PLEDGE OF FUTURE FEDERAL REVENUES, AND NOTES
ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION ARE NOT SUBJECT TO § 3–601(D) OF THIS ARTICLE OR
§ 7–1332 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Transportation shall transition all MARC operations and contracts to the MARC Rail
Authority to the extent permissible by such agreements.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.